Utah statutes.
15-6-3.   Interest on payments by state agencies.
(1) (a)  Interest shall accrue and be charged on payments overdue under
Section 15-6-2 at 2% above the rate paid by the Internal Revenue Service on
refund claims.
(b)  This rate is established and adjusted on a quarterly basis and shall be
applied on a per annum basis beginning on the day after payment is due, if the
payment due date is specified by contract, or on the 61st day after receipt of
the invoice, if no payment date is specified by contract.
(c)  Interest ceases to accrue on the date payment is made.
(2)  Any interest that remains unpaid at the end of any 60-day period or that
remains unpaid at the end of any specified period provided by contract shall
be added to the principal amount of the debt and shall accumulate interest.
(3)  A state agency may not seek additional appropriations to pay interest
that accrues because the agency failed to make payments as required by Section
15-6-2.
